ru: Способ набора: Быстрый набор кнопкой с фотографией; Кнопочный импульсный набор; Кнопочный тональный набор (DTMF); Дисковый импульсный набор; Сенсорный набор; Голосовой набор; Другой
pl: Metoda wybierania numeru: Szybkie wybieranie ze zdjęciami; Przycisk wybierania impulsowego; Przycisk wybierania tonowego (DTMF); Obrotowy (impulsowy); Ekran dotykowy; Wybieranie głosowe; Inne
ro-RO: Metoda de apelare: Apelare rapidă cu fotografie; Buton cu acționare prin impuls; Ton de buton (DTMF); Rotativ (impuls); Ecran tactil; Apelare vocală; Altele
pt-BR: Método de discagem: Teclas de discagem rápida de fotos; Pulso de botão-pressão; Tom de botão de pressão (DTMF); Rotativo (pulso); Tela sensível ao toque; Discagem por voz; Outro
it: Metodo di composizione: Chiamata rapida foto; Impulso a pulsante; Tono pulsante (DTMF); Rotativo (a impulsi); Touchscreen; Composizione vocale; Altro
sl-SI: Način klicanja: Hitro klicanje s fotografijo; Pritisni gumb; Tipkovno tonsko klicanje (DTMF); Vrteno klicanje (pulzno); Zaslon na dotik; Glasovno klicanje; Drugo
el: Μέθοδος κλήσης: Γρήγορη κλήση με φωτογραφία; Παλμός πατήματος κουμπιών; Τόνος πατήματος κουμπιών (DTMF); Κλήση με περιστροφικό επιλογέα (παλμός); Οθόνη αφής; Φωνητική πληκτρολόγηση; Άλλο
zh-TW: 撥號方式: 照片快撥; 按鍵式脈衝模式; 按鍵式音頻撥號 (DTMF); 旋轉式 (脈衝); 觸控螢幕; 語音撥號; 其他
en: Dialing method: Photo speed-dial; Push-button pulse; Push-button tone (DTMF); Rotary (pulse); Touchscreen; Voice dial; Other
bg-BG: Метод на набиране: Бързо набиране на снимки; Импулс на бутон за натискане; Тон на бутон за натискане (DTMF); Ротационен (импулсен); Сензорен екран; Гласово набиране; Други
sk-SK: Metóda vytáčania: Rýchla voľba s fotografiami; Tlačidlová voľba s impulzmi; Tlačidlová voľba s tónmi (DTMF); Rotačný (pulzný); Dotykový displej; Hlasové vytáčanie; Iné
nb: Oppringingsmetode: Hurtigvalg med bilde; Trykknapp med pulsoppringing; Trykknapp med toneoppringing (DTMF); Rotasjon (puls); Berøringsskjerm; Talestyrt oppringing; Annet
pt-PT: Método de marcação: Marcação rápida para fotografias; Botão de pressão; Marcação por tons (DTMF); Disco (pulso); Ecrã tátil; Marcação por voz; Outro
cs: Způsob vytáčení: Rychlé vytáčení pomocí fotografií; Impuls tlačítka; Tón tlačítka (DTMF); Rotační (impuls); Dotyková obrazovka; Hlasové vytáčení; Jiné
fi: Numeron valintatapa: Valokuvan pikavalintanäppäimet; Painikepulssi; Painikeääni (DTMF); Pyörivä (pulssi); Kosketusnäyttö; Äänivalinta; Muu
tr: Arama yöntemi: Fotoğrafla hızlı arama; Düğme darbeli; Düğme tonu (DTMF); Döner (darbeli); Dokunmatik ekran; Sesli arama; Diğer
sv: Uppringningsmetod: Snabbval för foto; Tryckknappspuls; Tryckknappston (DTMF); Roterande (puls); Pekskärm; Röstuppringning; Övrigt
zh-CN: 拨号方式: 照片快捷拨号; 按键脉冲拨号; 按键音调拨号 (DTMF); 旋转拨号（脉冲）; 触摸屏拨号; 语音拨号; 其他
da: Opkaldsmetode: Foto-hurtigopkald; Trykknappuls; Trykknaptone (DTMF); Roterende (puls); Touchskærm; Stemmeopkald; Andet
es: Método de marcación: Marcación rápida de fotos; Pulso de pulsador; Tono de pulsador (DTMF); Rotatorio (pulso); Pantalla táctil; Marcación por voz; Otros
ja: ダイヤル方法: 写真スピードダイヤル; プッシュボタンパルス; プッシュボタン音 (DTMF); ロータリー (パルス); タッチスクリーン; 音声ダイヤル; その他
nl: Kiesmethode: Foto snelkiezen; Drukknoppuls; Drukknoptoon (DTMF); Roterend (puls); Touchscreen; Spraakgestuurd kiezen; Andere
lt-LT: Numerio rinkimo būdas: Nuotraukų greitojo rinkimo; Mygtuko paspaudimo impulsas; Mygtuko paspaudimo tonas (DTMF); Rotacinis (impulsinis); Jutiklinis ekranas; Balso rinkimas; Kita
th: วิธีการโทรออก: โทรด่วนสำหรับถ่ายภาพ; ปุ่มกดพัลส์; เสียงปุ่มกด (DTMF); โรตารี (พัลส์); แบบทัชสกรีน; การโทรออกด้วยเสียง; อื่นๆ
fr: Méthode de composition du numéro: Raccourci photo; Impulsion par bouton-poussoir; Tonalité du bouton-poussoir (DTMF); Rotatif (impulsion); Écran tactile; Numérotation vocale; Autre
hr-HR: Način biranja brojeva: Brzo biranje na zaslonu; Puls na tipku; Ton tipke (DTMF); Rotacijski (pulsni); Zaslon osjetljiv na dodir; Glasovno biranje; Ostalo
de: Wählmethode: Foto-Kurzwahl; Druckknopfimpuls; Tastenton (DTMF); Rotierend (Impuls); Touchscreen; Sprachwahl; Sonstiges
hu: Tárcsázási mód: Fényképes gyorshívó gombok; Nyomógombos impulzusos tárcsázás; Nyomógomb hang (DTMF); Forgó (impulzus); Érintőképernyő; Hangtárcsázás; Egyéb
vi: Cách thức quay số: Gọi nhanh bằng ảnh; Quay số xung bằng nút bấm; Quay số âm thanh bằng nút bấm (DTMF); Quay số bằng mặt số xuay (xung); Màn hình cảm ứng; Quay số bằng giọng nói; Khác
ko: 전화 걸기 방법: 사진 단축 다이얼; 푸시 버튼 펄스; 푸시 버튼 톤(DTMF); 회전(펄스); 터치스크린; 음성 다이얼; 기타